Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2274
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Nebraska Senior Volunteer Program Act is to provide volunteer community service opportunities for older persons following priorities outlined in the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, as the act existed on January 1, 2017.

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 19.